Utah statutes.
76-8-512.   Impersonation of officer.
A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who:
(1)  impersonates a public servant or a peace officer with intent to deceive
another or with intent to induce another to submit to his pretended official
authority or to rely upon his pretended official act;
(2)  falsely states he is a public servant or a peace officer with intent to
deceive another or to induce another to submit to his pretended official
authority or to rely upon his pretended official act; or
(3)  displays or possesses without authority any badge, identification card,
other form of identification, any restraint device, or the uniform of any
state or local governmental entity, or a reasonable facsimile of any of these
items, with the intent to deceive another or with the intent to induce another
to submit to his pretended official authority or to rely upon his pretended
official act.
